North Carolina, session 2025, HB892.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The Department of Commerce shall establish a grant program to
encourage and facilitate residents of Western North Carolina that were impacted by Hurricane
Helene to obtain commercial drivers licenses (CDLs). The grant program established in this
section shall provide funds to a qualifying CDL training provider to cover the cost of CDL
training programs and shall provide stipends for temporary accommodations for trainees in the
CDL programs receiving funding under this section. A qualifying CDL training provider shall
meet the following criteria:
(1) Must offer a four-week accelerated CDL training program.
(2) Must be authorized to conduct on-site CDL testing to streamline licensing.
(3) Must have enrollment and training facilities within a 75-mile radius of
Asheville.
SECTION 1.(b) The Department of Commerce shall provide a qualifying CDL
training provider a grant equaling four thousand dollars ($4,000) per trainee, payable to the
qualifying CDL training provider upon successful completion of the program and the receipt of
a CDL by the trainee. The Department of Commerce shall also provide a grant equaling one
thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for trainees needing accommodations during their
participation in the CDL training program, payable directly to participating local hotels or motels
proximally located to the CDL training facility, for trainees that demonstrate a financial need and
that do not reside in close proximity to the CDL training facility. The Department shall award no
more than two hundred seventy-seven thousand five hundred dollars ($277,500) of funds
appropriated in this act for grants for trainee accommodations. A trainee under this section shall
be a resident of this State, and priority shall be given to residents of a county affected by
Hurricane Helene. The Department of Commerce shall establish a streamlined application
system, including options for online and in-person applications, to verify residency, assess
financial need, and facilitate program enrollment. In addition, the Department of Commerce shall
organize partnerships with (i) local hotels and motels for receipt of grants for trainee stipends
and (ii) local employers and construction firms to assist graduates of the CDL training program
in securing employment directly linked to disaster recovery and rebuilding efforts.
*H892-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.(c) For the purposes of this section, the terms "CDL training provider"
and "CDL training programs" refer to entry-level driver training, as defined in 49 C.F.R. §
380.605.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding G.S. 143C-5-2, there is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Department of Commerce the sum of two million five hundred thousand
dollars ($2,500,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used for the grant
program described in Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 892-First Edition